Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS; PRESERVATION

SUBTITLE B. PRESERVATION

CHAPTER 3151. PRESERVATION OF VIEW OF STATE CAPITOL

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 3151.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Center of the Capitol dome" means the point at 653 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818555.07, Y-230595.65.

(2) "Texas Plane Coordinate" means the central zone of the Texas State Coordinate Systems as defined by the U.S. Coast and Geodetic Survey, dated 1945 and revised in March 1978.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3151.002. DEFINITION OF CAPITOL VIEW CORRIDOR. In this chapter, "Capitol view corridor" means:

(1) the South Mall of The University of Texas Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 594 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818794.86, Y-234376.98, and extends along a bearing of S 2 7 0.0 W for a distance of 3790.248 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818654.87, Y-230589.32; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 594 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818628.71, Y-234341.64, and extends along a bearing of S 2 39 17.7 W for a distance of 3748.053 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818455.09, Y-230597.61.

(2) the Waterloo Park Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 496 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820189.70, Y-230799.91, and extends along a bearing of S 86 21 3.1 W for a distance of 1650.373 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818542.67, Y-230694.87; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 480 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820300.13, Y-229756.25, and extends along a bearing of N 67 16 4.1 W for a distance of 1939.019 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818511.73, Y-230505.53.

(3) the Wooldridge Park Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 515 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2816727.54, Y-229659.96, and extends along a bearing of N 60 5 58.0 E for a distance of 2055.569 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818509.50, Y-230684.66; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 536 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2816925.57, Y-229291.91, and extends along a bearing of N 54 4 50.4 E for a distance of 2089.263 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818617.55, Y-230517.56.

(4) the French Legation Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 539 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821177.01, Y-227894.81, and extends along a bearing of N 42 37 44.3 W for a distance of 3765.605 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818626.83, Y-230665.30; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 539 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821144.99, Y-227833.18, and extends along a bearing of N 44 39 68.5 W for a distance of 3787.992 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818482.12, Y-230527.25.

(5) the Lamar Bridge Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 460 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2813589.52, Y-227457.92, and extends along a bearing of N 56 44 9.5 E for a distance of 5874.699 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818596.90, Y-230686.48; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 460 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2813419.55, Y-226934.03, and extends along a bearing of N 55 25 10.4 E for a distance of 6308.017 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818613.13, Y-230514.22.

(6) the South Congress at East Live Oak Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 574 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2814945.42, Y-218622.48, and extends along a bearing of N 16 19 7.6 E for a distance of 12505.861 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818459.33, Y-230624.51; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 574 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2815051.19, Y-218649.13, and extends along a bearing of N 16 48 23.4 E for a distance of 12450.162 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818651.03, Y-230567.50.

(7) the Mopac Bridge Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 498 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2808292.26, Y-229412.05, and extends along a bearing of N 83 58 33.0 E for a distance of 10331.327 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818566.53, Y-230496.30; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 485 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2808930.31, Y-230333.64, and extends along a bearing of N 87 50 44.3 E for a distance of 9628.852 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818552.35, Y-230695.61.

(8) the South Lamar at La Casa Drive Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 656 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2806422.18, Y-219725.23, and extends along a bearing of N 47 47 22.8 E for a distance of 16290.678 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818488.35, Y-230670.13; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 656 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2806443.28, Y-219708.55, and extends along a bearing of N 48 24 0.0 E for a distance of 16286.017 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818621.93, Y-230521.28.

(9) the Barton Creek Pedestrian Bridge Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 445 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2811033.87, Y-227139.69, and extends along a bearing of N 64 37 45.5 E for a distance of 8277.813 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818513.32, Y-230686.51; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 460 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2812177.38, Y-227545.58, and extends along a bearing of N 65 15 5.2 E for a distance of 7070.209 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818598.22, Y-230505.43.

(10) the Pleasant Valley Road at Lakeshore Drive Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 450 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2826332.31, Y-219396.73, and extends along a bearing of N 34 21 30.0 W for a distance of 13634.929 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818637.21, Y-230652.69; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 450 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2826129.04, Y-218986.86, and extends along a bearing of N 33 32 6.6 W for a distance of 13861.422 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818471.32, Y-230541.00.

(11) the East Eleventh Street Threshold Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 517 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821382.21, Y-228956.12, and extends along a bearing of N 61 38 31.4 W for a distance of 3269.672 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818504.91, Y-230509.14; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 517 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821418.78, Y-228980.65, and extends along a bearing of N 58 60 12.7 W for a distance of 3289.227 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818604.20, Y-230682.75.

(12) the North-Bound Lanes of Interstate Highway 35 Between the Municipal Police and Courts Building and West Tenth Street Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 501 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820624.99, Y-227858.68, and extends along a bearing of N 38 46 6.5 W for a distance of 3433.34 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818475.11, Y-230535.59; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 491 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820883.74, Y-228742.33, and extends along a bearing of N 49 33 37.2 W for a distance of 2977.840 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point begin located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818617.34, Y-230673.89.

(13) the South-Bound Lanes of the Upper Deck of Interstate Highway 35 Between Concordia College and the Martin Luther King Boulevard Overpass Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 648 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2822432.77, Y-233117.96, and extends along a bearing of S 55 43 8.2 W for a distance of 4627.079 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818609.48, Y-230511.74; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 618 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2823639.09, Y-235471.26, and extends along a bearing of S 47 0 43.0 W for a distance of 7045.415 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818485.40, Y-230667.38.

(14) the North-Bound Lanes of Interstate Highway 35 Between Waller Creek Plaza and the Municipal Police and Court Building Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 498 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820389.72, Y-226977.21, and extends along a bearing of N 28 17 53.1 W for a distance of 4058.419 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818465.79, Y-230550.62; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 498 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820450.80, Y-227277.98, and extends along a bearing of N 28 14 42.1 W for a distance of 3823.132 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818641.53, Y-230645.90.

(15) the North-Bound Lanes of Interstate Highway 35 Between Third Street and the Waller Creek Plaza Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 482 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820010.77, Y-225710.94, and extends along a bearing of N 17 43 6.5 W for a distance of 5098.378 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818459.13, Y-230567.46; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 495 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820205.46, Y-226432.65, and extends along a bearing of N 20 20 46.9 W for a distance of 4479.853 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818647.84, Y-230632.99.

(16) the East Seventh Street Bridge Over the Texas-New Orleans Railroad Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 476 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2829646.58, Y-224957.77, and extends along a bearing of N 62 35 42.1 W for a distance of 12442.553 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818600.39, Y-230684.79; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 476 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2829633.60, Y-224932.05, and extends along a bearing of N 63 23 0.0 W for a distance of 12442.674 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818509.56, Y-230506.61.

(17) the Longhorn Shores Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 435 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2823252.67, Y-220131.43, and extends along a bearing of N 23 40 36.4 W for a distance of 11470.713 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818646.30, Y-230636.60; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 435 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2822788.44, Y-220147.97, and extends along a bearing of N 22 33 57.2 W for a distance of 11273.211 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818462.39, Y-230558.09.

(18) the Zilker Clubhouse Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 561 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2807259.05, Y-230056.68, and extends along a bearing of N 86 45 42.0 E for a distance of 11309.321 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818550.31, Y-230695.53; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 561 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2807248.18, Y-229969.74, and extends along a bearing of N 87 20 15.0 E for a distance of 11324.650 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818560.60, Y-230495.80.

(19) the Red Bud Trail Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 684 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2801662.96, Y-236155.75, and extends along a bearing of S 72 6 10.9 E for a distance of 17783.936 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818586.34, Y-230690.63; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 684 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2801887.25, Y-236038.78, and extends along a bearing of S 71 35 16.8 E for a distance of 17534.371 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818524.03, Y-230500.59.

(20) the Enfield Road Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 534 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2814317.00, Y-232540.28, and extends along a bearing of S 64 7 24.8 E for a distance of 4664.000 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818513.37, Y-230504.76; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 534 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2814166.24, Y-232616.36, and extends along a bearing of S 66 27 47.8 E for a distance of 4832.718 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818596.90, Y-230686.48.

(21) the Capital of Texas Highway Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 850 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2793153.22, Y-246055.75, and extends along a bearing of S 58 62 1.6 E for a distance of 29736.832 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818607.06, Y-230681.07; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 850 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2792663.44, Y-245928.13, and extends along a bearing of S 59 10 35.3 E for a distance of 30091.057 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818504.12, Y-230509.60.

(22) the 38th Street at Red River Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 609 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2823695.84, Y-238333.37, and extends along a bearing of S 34 12 57.2 W for a distance of 9290.302 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818471.78, Y-230650.98; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 609 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2823785.05, Y-238418.94, and extends along a bearing of S 33 9 15.9 W for a distance of 9410.983 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818638.21, Y-230540.07.

(23) the Robert Mueller Airport Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 603 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2831475.74, Y-237087.29, and extends along a bearing of S 62 55 39.9 W for a distance of 14460.117 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818599.97, Y-230506.29; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 603 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2831203.80, Y-237067.65, and extends along a bearing of S 63 18 20.5 W for a distance of 14208.702 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818509.52, Y-230684.67.

(24) the Martin Luther King Boulevard at IH-35 Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 570 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821823.12, Y-232059.98, and extends along a bearing of S 64 15 51.7 W for a distance of 3582.510 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818595.97, Y-230504.39; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 570 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821665.89, Y-232039.68, and extends along a bearing of S 66 46 10.3 W for a distance of 3431.091 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818512.97, Y-230686.35.

(25) the Oakwood Cemetery Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 662 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2823518.05, Y-231483.66, and extends along a bearing of S 78 43 9.6 W for a distance of 5042.788 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818572.69, Y-230497.21; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 662 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2823496.42, Y-231576.82, and extends along a bearing of S 79 54 22.8 W for a distance of 5038.813 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818535.60, Y-230693.73.

(26) the East 12th Street at IH-35 Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 525 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821503.64, Y-229689.85, and extends along a bearing of N 74 46 47.6 W for a distance of 3086.184 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818525.71, Y-230500.05; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 523 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821304.47, Y-229769.21, and extends along a bearing of N 71 16 29.8 W for a distance of 2872.654 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818583.86, Y-230691.41.

(27) the Lyndon Baines Johnson Library Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 596 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821830.47, Y-234589.86, and extends along a bearing of S 40 20 57.3 W for a distance of 5162.945 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818477.75, Y-230659.06; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 596 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821938.69, Y-233990.42, and extends along a bearing of S 43 38 37.1 W for a distance of 4790.234 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818625.90, Y-230525.05.

(28) the North Congress Avenue at Martin Luther King Boulevard Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 531 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2819238.03, Y-232793.53, and extends along a bearing of N 14 46 25.5 E for a distance of 2303.720 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818650.57, Y-230565.97; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 531 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2819171.57, Y-232814.96, and extends along a bearing of N 16 0 38.0 E for a distance of 2305.521 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818458.72, Y-230622.41.

(29) the field level of the Memorial Stadium Practice Center Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 550 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820995.40, Y-233291.51, and extends along a bearing of N 40 34 35.4 E for a distance of 3637.696 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818629.21, Y-230528.54; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 550 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820805.43, Y-233307.74, and extends along a bearing of N 41 18 34.5 E for a distance of 3525.556 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818478.12, Y-230659.50.

(30) the entrance terrace to the University of Texas Swim Center Corridor, which encompasses all of the area between two lines:

(A) one of which begins at an elevation of 540 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2821029.40, Y-232523.71, and extends along a bearing of N 50 14 50.5 E for a distance of 3138.424 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818616.54, Y-230516.77; and

(B) the second of which begins at an elevation of 540 feet above sea level at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2820873.01, Y-232433.33, and extends along a bearing of N 53 31 42.3 E for a distance of 2959.714 feet to a point 100 feet from the center of the Capitol dome, this point being located at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818492.95, Y-230674.01.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3151.0021. DEFINITION OF CONGRESS AVENUE VIEW CORRIDOR. In this chapter, "Congress Avenue view corridor" means all of the area between two lines:

(1) one of which begins at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2817236.98, Y-226449.47 and terminates at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818255.32, Y-229927.70; and

(2) the second of which begins at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2817394.92, Y-226404.24 and terminates at Texas Plane Coordinate X-2818441.82, Y-229874.83.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1288 (H.B. 2256), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 3151.003. APPLICABILITY. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) the construction, renovation, or equipment of the Darrell K Royal-Texas Memorial Stadium or to improvements related to the stadium, except that the height of the stadium or a related improvement may not exceed 666 feet above sea level;

(2) the construction, redevelopment, or improvement of 11th Street pursuant to the East 11th and 12th Streets Redevelopment Program, except that the height of an improvement may not exceed 600 feet above sea level; or

(3) the construction, redevelopment, or improvement of Robert Mueller Municipal Airport under a redevelopment and reuse plan for the airport adopted by the City of Austin.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 556, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES; CONFLICTING REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 3151.051. PROHIBITED CONSTRUCTION; CAPITOL VIEW CORRIDOR. A person may not begin, in a Capitol view corridor, construction of a structure that would exceed the maximum permissible height computed in accordance with the following formula:

h = (((653' - eVP) x (b'))/b) - (eS - eVP)

where:

h is the maximum permissible height of the structure;

b is the distance between the selected view point and the center of the Capitol dome;

b' is the distance between the view point and the structure;

eS is the elevation of the structure; and

eVP is the elevation of the view point.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1288 (H.B. 2256), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 3151.0511. PROHIBITED CONSTRUCTION; CONGRESS AVENUE VIEW CORRIDOR. A person may not begin, in the Congress Avenue view corridor, construction of a structure:

(1) on the west side of Congress Avenue that:

(A) is within 60 feet of Congress Avenue; and

(B) has a height that exceeds 90 feet; and

(2) on the east side of Congress Avenue that:

(A) is within 40 feet of Congress Avenue; and

(B) has a height that exceeds 90 feet.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1288 (H.B. 2256), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 3151.052. TRANSFERABLE CONSTRUCTION RIGHTS PROHIBITED. The governing body of a municipality affected by this chapter may not grant transferable construction rights to mitigate the impact of this chapter in a Capitol view corridor.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3151.053. CONFLICT WITH OTHER REQUIREMENTS. If a requirement of this chapter conflicts with a requirement enacted by a municipality or with any other requirement under state law, the stricter requirement prevails.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1288 (H.B. 2256), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 3151.101. INJUNCTION. (a) A person may file an action to enjoin a violation or threatened violation of Section 3151.051.

(b) The court may grant appropriate relief.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.